Illinois, session 104th, HB4686.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Food Handling Regulation Enforcement Act is 5amended by changing Section 3.08 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 625/3.08)7    Sec. 3.08. Food allergy awareness.8    (a) A restaurant shall display a notice indicating to 9consumers that any information regarding food allergies must 10be communicated to an employee of the restaurant.11    (b) An employee of a restaurant who receives allergy 12information from a consumer shall communicate the consumer's 13information to the restaurant's person in charge or the 14certified food protection manager on duty. A person working 15with a consumer's food must take necessary safety precautions 16when preparing the food to avoid cross contamination of the 17food with allergens.18    (c) A restaurant meets the requirements of this Section if 19the restaurant displays a notice regarding food allergies or 20provides a statement regarding food allergies on its menu that 21was approved in another state before the effective date of 22this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly.23    (d) A multi-state business or a franchisee, as that term   HB4686- 2 -LRB104 18240 BDA 31679 b1is defined in the Franchise Disclosure Act of 1987, meets the 2requirements of this Section if the multi-state business or 3franchisee has an internal policy that requires a notice 4regarding allergies to be displayed or a statement regarding 5food allergies to be provided on the menu.6    (e) On or before January 1, 2020, the Department of Public 7Health shall create and make available on its website for 8download the notice required to be displayed under subsection 9(a) of this Section.10    (f) From the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 11101st General Assembly through July 1, 2020, enforcement of 12this Section shall be limited to education and notification of 13the requirements of this Section to encourage compliance.14    (g) Beginning January 1, 2028, the owner of each 15restaurant in the State shall include in all of the 16restaurant's menus and online menus clear and conspicuous 17notices identifying each menu item that contains a major food 18allergen, as defined in subsection (qq) of Section 201 of the 19Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.20    The owner of a restaurant who violates this subsection is 21subject to a fine of $500 for a violation of this subsection 22and an additional $500 fine for each menu item that contains a 23major food allergen but does not contain the notice required 24under this subsection.25    When conducting an inspection of a restaurant, inspectors 26for the Department of Public Health and local health   HB4686- 3 -LRB104 18240 BDA 31679 b1departments shall visually verify that the menus and online 2menus used by the restaurant meet the requirements of this 3subsection. The Department of Public Health or a local health 4department may order the immediate cessation of operations at 5any restaurant if one or more violations of the allergen 6notice requirements of this subsection are observed during 5 7separate food safety inspections.8    9(Source: P.A. 101-495, eff. 8-23-19.)